en: Kiteboard Parts
xx: Kiteboard Parts
cs: Díly pro kiteboard
da: Kiteboard – dele
de: Kiteboardteile
es: Piezas para kitesurf
fr: Pièces détachées pour kitesurf
it: Parti di ricambio kitesurf
ja: カイトボードパーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor kiteboards
no: Kitebrett-deler
pl: Elementy desek do kitesurfingu
pt: Peças para kiteboard
ru: Детали для кайтбордов
sv: Delar till kitesurfbrädor
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü Tahtası Parçaları

en: Kiteboards
xx: Kiteboards
cs: Kiteboardy
da: Kiteboards
de: Kiteboards
es: Tablas de kitesurf
fr: Planches de kitesurf
it: Kiteboard
ja: カイトボード
nl: Kiteboards
no: Kitebrett
pl: Deski do kitesurfingu
pt: Kiteboards
ru: Кайтборды
sv: Kitesurfbrädor
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü Tahtaları

en: Kitesurfing & Windsurfing Harnesses
xx: Kitesurfing & Windsurfing Harnesses
cs: Trapézy pro kitesurfing a windsurfing
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til kite- og windsurfing
de: Trapeze für Kite- & Windsurfen
es: Arneses para kitesurf y windsurf
fr: Harnais de kitesurf et windsurf
it: Imbragature per windsurf e kitesurf
ja: カイトサーフィン・ウィンドサーフィン用ハーネス
nl: Harnassen voor kite- en windsurfen
no: Seler til kitesurfing og brettseiling
pl: Uprzęże do kitesurfingu i windsurfingu
pt: Arnês para kitesurf e windsurf
ru: Трапеции для кайтсёрфинга и винсёрфинга
sv: Kitesurfselar
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü ve Rüzgar Sörfü Donanımları

en: Kitesurfing Kites
xx: Kitesurfing Kites
cs: Tažní draci pro kitesurfing
da: Kitesurfing – kites
de: Kitesurfing-Kites
es: Cometas de kitesurf
fr: Ailes de kitesurf
it: Aquiloni kitesurf
ja: カイトサーフィン用カイト
nl: Vliegers voor kitesurfen
no: Kitesurfing-drager
pl: Latawce do kitesurfingu
pt: Pipas de kitesurf
ru: Кайты для кайтсёрфинга
sv: Kitesurfkites
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü Uçurtmaları

en: Surfing
xx: Surfing
cs: Surfování
da: Surfing
de: Surfen
es: Surf
fr: Surf
it: Surf (sport)
ja: サーフィン
nl: Surfen
no: Surfing
pl: Surfing
pt: Surfe
ru: Товары для сёрфинга
sv: Surfing
tr: Sörf

en: Bodyboards
xx: Bodyboards
cs: Bodyboardy
da: Bodyboards
de: Bodyboards
es: Bodyboards
fr: Bodyboards
it: Bodyboard
ja: ボディボード
nl: Bodyboards
no: Bodyboard-brett
pl: Bodyboardy
pt: Pranchas de bodyboarding
ru: Доски для бодисёрфинга
sv: Bodyboards
tr: Bodyboard Tahtaları

en: Paddleboards
xx: Paddleboards
cs: Paddleboardy
da: Padlebrætter
de: Paddelboards
es: Paddleboards
fr: Paddleboards, Stand-up paddle
it: Paddleboard
ja: パドルボード
nl: Paddleboards
no: Padlebrett
pl: Deski do paddleboardingu
pt: Pranchas de paddleboard
ru: Пэдлборды
sv: Paddleboards
tr: Paddleboard Tahtaları

en: Skimboards
xx: Skimboards
cs: Skimboardy
da: Skimboards
de: Skimboards
es: Skimboards
fr: Skimboards
it: Skimboard
ja: スキムボード
nl: Skimboards
no: Skimboard-brett
pl: Deski do skimboardingu
pt: Pranchas de skimboarding
ru: Доски для сёрфинга по мелководью
sv: Skimboards
tr: Skimboard Tahtaları

en: Surf Leashes
xx: Surf Leashes
cs: Šňůry k surfovým prknům
da: Surfbrætremme
de: Fußleinen für Surfbretter
es: Correas para tablas de surf
fr: Sangles pour planches de surf
it: Lacci per tavole da surf
ja: サーフボード用リーシュコード
nl: Enkelbanden voor surfplanken
no: Fangremmer for surfebrett
pl: Smycze dla surferów
pt: Leashes de prancha de surfe
ru: Ремешки для сёрфинговых досок
sv: Fångremmar till surfingbrädor
tr: Sörf Tahtası Kayışları

en: Surfboard Cases & Bags
xx: Surfboard Cases & Bags
cs: Obaly na surfová prkna
da: Tasker til surfbrætter
de: Surfboard-Taschen
es: Fundas para tablas de surf
fr: Housses de planche de surf
it: Custodie per tavole da surf
ja: サーフボードケース
nl: Surfplankhoezen
no: Surfbrett-omslag
pl: Pokrowce na deski surfingowe
pt: Capas para prancha de surfe
ru: Футляры для сёрфинговых досок
sv: Surfingbrädesfodral
tr: Sörf Tahtası Kutuları

en: Surfboard Fins
xx: Surfboard Fins
cs: Ploutve k surfovým prknům
da: Finner til surfbrætter
de: Surfbrettfinnen
es: Aletas para tablas de surf
fr: Dérives pour planches de surf
it: Alette per tavole da surf
ja: サーフボード用フィン
nl: Skeggen voor surfplanken
no: Surfbrett-finner
pl: Stateczniki do desek surfingowych
pt: Quilhas
ru: Плавники для сёрфинговых досок
sv: Fenor till surfingbrädor
tr: Sörf Tahtası Yüzgeçleri

en: Surfboard Wax
xx: Surfboard Wax
cs: Vosky na surfová prkna
da: Voks til surfbrætter
de: Surfboard-Wachs
es: Cera para tablas de surf
fr: Cire pour planches de surf
it: Cera per tavole da surf
ja: サーフボード用ワックス
nl: Surfplankwas
no: Surfbrett-voks
pl: Wosk do desek surfingowych
pt: Parafina
ru: Воск для сёрфинговых досок
sv: Vax till surfingbrädor
tr: Sörf Tahtası Cilası

en: Surfboards
xx: Surfboards
cs: Surfová prkna
da: Surfbrætter
de: Surfbretter
es: Tablas de surf
fr: Planches de surf
it: Tavole da surf
ja: サーフボード
nl: Surfplanken
no: Surfbrett
pl: Deski surfingowe
pt: Pranchas de surfe
ru: Доски для сёрфинга
sv: Surfingbrädor
tr: Sörf Tahtaları

en: Surfing Gloves
xx: Surfing Gloves
cs: Rukavice na surfing
da: Surfhandsker
de: Handschuhe für Surfer
es: Guantes de surf
fr: Gants de surf
it: Guanti da surf
ja: サーフィン用グローブ
nl: Surfhandschoenen
no: Surfehansker
pl: Rękawice surfingowe
pt: Luvas para surfe
ru: Перчатки для сёрфинга
sv: Surfhandskar
tr: Sörf Eldivenleri

en: Surfing Tail Pads
xx: Surfing Tail Pads
cs: Ocasní podložky na surfová prkna
da: Surfing – skridunderlag
de: Surfpads
es: Antideslizantes para tablas de surf
fr: Pads de surf
it: Protezione posteriore tavola da surf
ja: サーフィン用デッキパッド
nl: Surfgrips
no: Halematter til surfing
pl: Nakładki na deski surfingowe
pt: Decks para pranchas de surfe
ru: Хвостовые накладки для сёрфинга
sv: Tailpads för surfing
tr: Sörf Tahtası Kuyruk Kısmı

en: Swimming, Swimming equipment
xx: Swimming
cs: Plavání
da: Svømning
de: Schwimmen, Schwimmausrüstung
es: Natación, Equipo de natación
fr: Natation, Équipement de natation, Article de natation, Matériel d'aide à la flottaison, Bouée, planche, matériel d'aide à la flottaison, Matériel d'aquagym
it: Nuoto
ja: 水泳・スイミング
nl: Zwemmen
no: Svømming
pl: Pływanie
pt: Natação
ru: Товары для плавания
sv: Simning
tr: Yüzme

en: Child Swimming Aids
xx: Child Swimming Aids
cs: Plavecká křidélka
da: Svømmevinger
de: Schwimmflügel
es: Ayudas de natación para niños
fr: Brassards et flotteurs de natation, Brassard de flottaison
it: Braccioli gonfiabili per bambini
ja: 子供用アームヘルパー
nl: Zwemhulpjes voor kinderen
no: Svømmevinger for barn
pl: Skrzydełka do pływania
pt: Boias de braço para crianças
ru: Средства для обучения детей плаванию
sv: Flytkuddar för barn
tr: Çocuklar için Yüzme Yardımcıları

en: Hand Paddles
xx: Hand Paddles
cs: Ruční pádla
da: Håndpadler
de: Handpaddel
es: Palas para manos
fr: Paddles de natation, Plaquettes (natation)
it: Pinne per mani
ja: アクアグローブ
nl: Handpaddels
no: Håndpadlere
pl: Łapki do pływania
pt: Nadadeiras de mão
ru: Лопатки для плавания
sv: Handpaddlar
tr: El Paletleri

en: Kickboards
xx: Kickboards
cs: Plovací desky
da: Svømmeplader
de: Schwimmbretter
es: Tablas de natación
fr: Flotteurs
it: Tavolette da nuoto
ja: ビート板
nl: Zwemplankjes
no: Svømmebrett
pl: Deski do pływania
pt: Prancha para trabalho de perna
ru: Доски для плавания
sv: Simplattor
tr: Yüzücü Tahtaları

en: Pull Buoys
xx: Pull Buoys
cs: Plovací matrace
da: Pull buoys
de: Pull Buoys
es: Pullbuoys
fr: Flotteurs Pull Buoy
it: Pull buoy
ja: スイムヘルパー
nl: Zwemboeien
no: Pull buoys
pl: Ósemki do pływania
pt: Boias para tração
ru: Колобашки для плавания
sv: Dolmar
tr: Bacak Süngerleri